Tennessee, session 114, HB0683.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 62-35-102, is amended by adding
the following new subdivision:
( ) "Enhanced armed guard" means an armed security guard/officer who has
successfully completed enhanced armed guard training as described in § 62-35-144(c)
and applied for and received an enhanced armed guard certification from the
commissioner as described in § 62-35-144(b);
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 62-35-125, is amended by
designating the existing language as subsection (a) and adding the following as subsection (b):
(b)
(1) An enhanced armed guard may carry a rifle-caliber weapon only if
certified to carry such firearm. An enhanced armed guard may carry only the
type of rifle-caliber weapon that the commissioner prescribes by rule when in the
performance of the guard's duties.
(2) An enhanced armed guard may only deploy a rifle-caliber weapon,
whether in an offensive or defensive posture, when a legitimate threat
necessitating such deployment is perceived to exist or be imminent. During such
time as a threat necessitating deployment of a rifle-caliber weapon is not
perceived to exist or be imminent, the rifle-caliber weapon must be securely
stored in such manner as the commissioner may prescribe by rule.
HB0683
000443
- 1 -

SECTION 3. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 62, Chapter 35, Part 1, is amended by
adding the following as a new section:
62-35-144.
(a) To be eligible for certification as an enhanced armed guard, an applicant
must:
(1) Hold a current registration card issued by the commissioner to act as
an armed security guard/officer in this state, and be in good standing;
(2)
(A) Have a minimum of five (5) years of experience as a full-time
law enforcement officer and be either:
(i) Retired, or at the time of prospective certification will be
retired, from the employing law enforcement agency in good
standing; or
(ii) Separated, or at the time of prospective certification will
be separated, from the employing law enforcement agency in
good standing; or
(B) Have a minimum of four (4) years of experience as a full-time
member of the armed forces of the United States while in a combat arms
military occupational specialty and be either:
(i) Retired, or at the time of prospective certification will be
retired, from the armed forces having received an honorable
discharge; or
(ii) Separated, or at the time of prospective certification will
be separated, from the armed forces having received an
honorable discharge;
- 2 - 000443

(3) Submit to and pass, to the commissioner's satisfaction:
(A) A criminal background check; and
(B) A psychological evaluation as described in § 38-8-106(9); and
(4) Successfully complete, to the commissioner's satisfaction:
(A) A written examination; and
(B) An in-person enhanced armed guard training course
approved by the commissioner.
(b) The commissioner may request from an applicant such information as the
commissioner deems necessary to constitute proof of an applicant's eligibility pursuant
to subsection (a). Upon receipt of a completed application and finding after investigation
that the applicant armed security guard/officer meets all eligibility requirements for
enhanced armed guard certification, the commissioner shall issue a certification to the
applicant upon the appropriate payment of fees as established by the commissioner.
(c)
(1) The enhanced armed guard training course developed or approved
by the commissioner must be offered no less than quarterly, be at least sixteen
(16) hours in length, and in addition to legal, weapon handling, marksmanship,
and tactics training, must also include:
(A) Scenario-based training on when a rifle-caliber weapon may
be deployed in an offensive or defensive posture; and
(B) Training on the secure storage of a rifle-caliber weapon when
the weapon is not deployed.
(2) The commissioner may contract with a third party to administer the
training required by this section.
- 3 - 000443

(3) The commissioner may apply as full or partial credit toward the
enhanced armed guard training required by this section, a rifle-caliber weapon
training course that an applicant completed while in the armed forces or
employed as a law enforcement officer, as long as the commissioner finds that
such training is equivalent or superior to that which is required by this section.
(d) An enhanced armed guard certification expires one (1) year from the date of
issuance. To renew the certification, an enhanced armed guard must submit to an
annual criminal background check, to be conducted by the commissioner. The
commissioner may set a reasonable fee to cover the cost to conduct the annual
background check.
SECTION 4. The commissioner is authorized to promulgate rules to effectuate this act.
The rules must be promulgated in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act,
compiled in Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 4, Chapter 5.
SECTION 5. For the purpose of promulgating rules, this act takes effect upon becoming
a law, the public welfare requiring it. For all other purposes, this act takes effect July 1, 2025,
the public welfare requiring it.
- 4 - 000443